Massachusetts, session 194th, H359.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 259 of chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking out the definition of “Core competencies” and inserting in place thereof the following:- 
''Core competencies'', a set of overlapping and mutually reinforcing skills and knowledge 
essential for effective community health work in core areas that include, but are not limited to: 
(a) outreach methods and strategies; 
(b) client and community assessment; 
(c) effective communication; 
(d) culturally-based communication and care; 
(e) health education for behavior change; 

of 5 10  (f) support, advocacy and coordination of care for clients; 
(g) navigation and connection to resources for health needs, including but not 
limited to behavioral health, mental health and substance use disorder services; 
(h) application of public health concepts and approaches; 
(i) community capacity building; and 
(j) writing and technical communication skills. 
SECTION 2. Section 260 of said chapter 112 is hereby amended by striking out the third 
paragraph in its entirety. 
SECTION 3. (a) As used in this section, the following term shall have the following 
meaning:  
“Community health worker services,” services provided by a community health worker, 
including but not limited to, health education, information, and outreach; health promotion and 
coaching; navigation of health care and community-based services, resources and systems; care 
coordination; socioemotional support; and self-advocacy skill-building. 
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the group insurance 
commission public employee plans under Chapter 32A; the division of medical assistance under 
chapter 118E and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations, 
accountable care organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party 
administrators under contract to a managed care organization or primary care clinician plan; 
insurance companies organized under Chapter 175; non-profit hospital service corporations 

of 5 30 organized under Chapter 176A; medical service corporations organized under chapter 176B; and 
health maintenance organizations organized under chapter 176G shall provide coverage and 
reimbursement for community health worker services delivered by a certified community health 
worker, as defined by Section 259 of Chapter 112, or a community health worker in the process 
of obtaining certification, who is employed by a health care provider entity, community-based 
organization, or municipality, including entities that provide only non-medical health-related 
services and support.  
(c) The executive office of health and human services shall obtain any federal 
authorization necessary to implement this section and maximize federal financial participation 
for the coverage and benefits provided under this section. 
(d) The office of Medicaid, the division of insurance and the group insurance commission 
shall promulgate regulations or other guidance necessary to effectuate this section, including 
establishing provider organization enrollment pathways for non-health care entities.  
SECTION 4. (a) There shall be a Community Health Worker Workforce Development 
Taskforce. The taskforce shall be chaired by the president of the senate or their designee and the 
speaker of the house of representatives or their designee, and shall consist of the following 
members: the senate chair of the joint committee on health care financing, the house chair of the 
joint committee on health care financing, the senate chair of the joint committee of public health, 
the house chair of the joint committee on public health, the secretary of health and human 
services or their designee, the secretary of labor and workforce development or their designee, 
the assistant secretary for MassHealth or their designee, the commissioner of public health or 
their designee, the commissioner of mental health or their designee, the commissioner of the 

of 5 52 division of insurance or their designee, the executive director of the Health Policy Commission 
or their designee, a representative of the Massachusetts Association of Community Health 
Workers, a representative of the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, a 
representative of Health Care For All, a representative of the Massachusetts Health and Hospital 
Association, a representative of the Association for Behavioral Healthcare, a representative of 
the Massachusetts Public Health Alliance, a representative of a municipality employing 
community health workers, a representative of a provider organization employing community 
health workers, and a representative of a community-based organization employing community 
health workers.  
(b) The taskforce shall study and assess: (i) the existing community health worker 
workforce, including but not limited to: the current supply and distribution of community health 
workers by demographics, including age, race, ethnicity, language, disability status, sexual 
orientation, gender identity and other characteristics currently available through existing data 
sources; certification status; city, municipality or region of the state; role and scope of services 
provided; and employer type; (ii) the state of certification of community health workers, 
including barriers to certification; (iii) the sustainability of reimbursement of community health 
workers in health care and community-based settings; and (iv) opportunities and challenges in 
community health worker recruitment, retention, and career pathway development, including 
advancement in the health care workforce. 
(c) The taskforce shall issue a report with the findings under subsection (b) and 
recommendations on: (i) making data on community health workers collected by state agencies 
and contracted entities publicly available and actionable; (ii) addressing barriers to community 
health worker certification; (iii) standardizing community health worker roles based on core 

of 5 75 competencies; (iv) increasing community health worker recruitment, retention and career 
pathways for clinical and non-clinical roles; (v) building capacity among employers to 
effectively support and supervise community health workers; and (vi) creating a sustainable 
reimbursement structure for community health worker services, including considerations for 
providing a living wage. 
(d) The taskforce shall file its report, including any recommendations for proposed 
legislation or regulations, to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the joint 
committee on health care financing and the joint committee on public health no later than March 
31, 2026.